Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-1119
Excess cost, defined.

Excess cost means the difference between the total cost of the special education program excluding residential care minus the product of the number of students in the special education program multiplied by the adjusted average per pupil cost of the preceding year for the school district of residence of each child.

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3308;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 801;

Laws 2014, LB276, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 18;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 166.